District of Columbia statutes.
31-1209

Annual audit of Insurance Regulatory Trust Fund or District of Columbia Health Benefit Exchange Authority Fund.

Upon a vote of the Insurance Regulatory Trust Fund Bureau taken in accordance with its bylaws, the Insurance Regulatory Trust Fund Bureau, at its own expense, may annually arrange for an independent audit of the expenditures made in any fiscal year by the Insurance Regulatory Trust Fund or the District of Columbia Health Benefit Exchange Authority Fund established in § 31-3171.03(a). The Commissioner, the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking, the Executive Director of the District of Columbia Health Benefit Exchange Authority, and all other elements of the District of Columbia government shall cooperate with such an audit and shall make available all documents and records reasonably necessary to the conduct of the audit.

History

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-40, § 10, 40 DCR 6009
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-235, § 24(l), 44 DCR 818
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(y), 44 DCR 1730
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 36(c), 45 DCR 745
June 11, 2004, D.C. Law 15-166, § 4(h)(4), 51 DCR 2817
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 5082(c), 61 DCR 9990

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-2709.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-166 substituted “Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking” for “Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation”.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 rewrote the section.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4(h)(4) of Consolidation of Financial Services Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-381, February 27, 2004, 51 DCR 2653).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 5082(c) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 5082(c) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 5082(c) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).